Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1009
Body art facility, defined.

Body art facility means any room or space or any part thereof where body art is performed or where the business of body art is conducted.

Laws 2004, LB 906, § 8;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-346.02;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 271.